test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kissa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - kissá: # á-stems
    kissá+N+Sg+Nom: kissá
    kissá+N+Sg+Gen: kisá
    kissá+N+Sg+Acc: kisá
    kissá+N+Sg+Ill: kiisán
    kissá+N+Sg+Loc: kissáást
    kissá+N+Sg+Com: kissáin
    kissá+N+Sg+Abe: kisáttáá
    kissá+N+Ess: kissán
    kissá+N+Par: kissád
    kissá+N+Pl+Nom: kisáh
    kissá+N+Pl+Gen: kisái
    kissá+N+Pl+Acc: kissáid
    kissá+N+Pl+Ill: kissáid
    kissá+N+Pl+Loc: kissáin
    kissá+N+Pl+Com: kisáiguin
    kissá+N+Pl+Abe: kisáittáá
